modules/braille/libhyphen-utils/src/main/resources/tables/hyph_no_NO.dic
ISO8859-1
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
.aa6
.ab4b4a
.a2b1b
.ab7be
.ac6tin
.8ac
.a4c1t
.ac1ti
.ad8la.
.2a4d1l4
.ad3la
.ad6le.
.ad1le
.ad2r4
.a8d1s2
.a2f7f
.a2f5t4
.ag6na.
.ag1n
.ag1na
.ag6ne.
.ag1n4e
.a1g4r4
.ai2
.a6k
.ak6ka.
.a2kk
.ak1ka
.ak6ke.
.ak1ke
.ak3kl4
.ak3kr6
.ak6ne.
.6a2k1n2
.ak5ne
.ak6r6
.ak8sa.
.a4ks
.ak1sa
.ak4se.
.ak1se
.ak6ta
.a6k1t
.ak4te.
.ak1te
.akte4r
.akte1r5e
.ak5tr4
.akva7
.2akv2
.a6l
.albu5e2n
.a2l1b2
.al1b2u
.al4ge.
.a2lg
.al1ge
.al5gi
.al6ka.
.a2l1k
.al3ka
.al4ke.
.al1k4e
.al4kom
.al4la.
.a2l1l
.al4le.
.al1le
.al5leg
.al5lo
.al2l5s6
.al4ma.
.a2l1m
.al1ma
.al8me.
.al1me
.al4na
.4a2l1n
.al4pe.
.a2l1p2
.al1pe
.al6s7k
.2a2l1s
.als5o
.alt4a
.a2l1t
.al4ta.
.al5tar
.al4te.
.al1te
.alt3o
.al6ve.
.a8lv
.al1ve
.a2m7b
.am6ma.
.a2m1m4
.am1ma
.am4me.
.am1me
.a6m2s2
.am6ta
.a2m1t
.a6n
.ana3b
.a1na
.an4da.
.a6nd
.an1da
.an4de.
.an1de
.an5d4ra
.andr4
.2an3er
.a1ne
.anes5
.an4ga.
.a2ng
.an1ga
.an3g4e
.an4ge.
.an2g6e4s
.an4ja.
.a4n1j
.an4ka.
.a2nk
.an1ka
.an4ke.
.an1ke
.an4la.
.2anla
.a4n1l
.a4n3n
.an4na.
.an1na
.an7nal
.an1n4e
.an4ne.
.a6n3s2
.an4sa.
.an4se.
.an1se
.an6si.
.an1si
.a6n1t2
.an4ta.
.an4te.
.an1te
.an5ted
.an5tem
.an5t2e1p
.an4ti.
.an1ti
.an6tin
.an4tis
.an4tiv
.ap8lan
.a1pla
.apl6
.a2p1p6
.a2p8t
.2ar1b4i5
.1a2r1b8
.ar6de.
.a4rd
.ar1de
.ar4ge.
.a2r1g
.ar1ge
.ar5g6es
.ari6a
.2a1ri
.ar2i8e
.arie5ne
.ari1e4n
.ar5ka
.a4r1k
.ar8ka.
.arlan9
.a2r1l
.ar4me.
.a2r1m
.ar1me
.ar7m2ea2
.ar4na.
.2a2r2n
.ar3na
.ar3ne
.ar4ne.
.ar5ne1s2
.ar6ra.
.1arra
.a2r1r
.ar6r7u
.ar6ta.
.a6r1t
.ar4te.
.ar3te
.ar9ti
.ar6va.
.a2r1v
.arv4a
.ar4ve.
.ar4ve2d1
.ar4ver
.arvi6
.a6s
.a1s8ka
.as4ke.
.a2s1ke
.as5k2e1se
.as2ke1s
.as7ke1ta
.a2s4le.
.as1l4
.as1le
.as6pa.
.asp2
.as1pa
.a2s5s
.ast5ru
.astr4
.at4ki
.a4t3k2
.at4le.
.a6t3l6
.at1le
.at4na.
.a6t1n
.at3na
.at2o4
.2a4t3s
.at1te4
.a6tt
.at1t6r4
.a5ty
.au8de
.a2ud
.4a6u6e
.au8ga
.au4ge
.au4ka.
.au1k2a
.au8le.
.au1le
.au4r
.au6sa.
.a4u1sa
.au6se.
.a2u1se
.aus9k
.au4s1p2
.avi2
.a1v7i6d
.av7in1de
.a1vin
.avi6nd
.av4la.
.a6v1l2
.av4le.
.av1le
.a8v5s4
.b6
.b8a6la.
.1b4a
.ba3la
.ba4le.
.b2a1le
.ba4ne.
.ba1ne
.ba4re.
.ba3re
.ba4ri.
.b2a3ri
.ba8te.
.ba1te
.be4de.
.1be
.be1de
.bede4n
.be6d5e1ne
.be4d5et
.be8di.
.be1di
.be6ke.
.be5ke
.be4la.
.b2e1la
.be9nar
.b2e4na
.be4ne.
.be3ne
.be6re.
.b4er
.be1re
.be4res
.be8ri.
.be1ri
.be7ska
.b4e1s2
.b6e6sten
.bes1te
.b4e4ta.
.3b4et
.be1ta
.be6te.
.b2e3te
.b2i6de.
.1b4i
.bi1d
.bi1de
.bi6en
.b2ie
.bi4le.
.bi1le
.bi3let5
.bi6t3r4
.bli2ng5
.bl2
.b1li
.bo8da
.b2o
.b2o1d
.bo8de.
.bo3d4e
.b4ok5l4
.b4o8la
.b4ol
.b2on2
.bo4na.
.bo1na
.bo4ne.
.bo1ne
.brud8d7s6
.br8
.3b4ru
.br2ud
.bru6d1d
.brudds1å7
.bu6da.
.1b2u
.bu3da
.b2ud
.bu4et
.bus6sy
.bu2s1s
.by6de.
.1by
.by1de
.by8ta.
.by1ta
.bæ2
.bø8nen
.1b4ø
.bø2n
.bø1ne5
.bø8ner
.c4
.ca4en.
.1c4a
.c2a1e2
.c2a4r4s5
.ca6se
.c2e6b2
.c2os1
.4co4st
.d6
.da4ge.
.1da
.da1ge
.da4le.
.d2a1le
.da2m
.da4ne.
.d8a1ne
.d4a4ta5
.deka9r
.1de
.8d4e1ka
.4dek2o7d
.de5k2o
.de4le.
.de1le
.4de4l5ei
.delei8ge.
.delei1g6e
.dele2ig
.d4e2l5s6
.de4mi.
.de1mi
.de3m6o7e
.de1mo
.den5sl4
.d2e6ns
.de4re.
.d2er
.de1re
.de4r5e4t
.de4ri.
.de1ri
.de6rim
.de4r5om
.d2ero
.2d4e4so
.de1s
.4de4sto
.d4es2t
.2de4u
.devi5s
.2de1v
.di2a
.1di
.di5e4l
.d2ie
.di6er
.di4et.
.di1et
.di4ne.
.d4i1ne
.dings7a2
.din8g2s1
.di2ng
.d6i4sk
.di8s3t
.do4en.
.1do
.d6o1e
.doe2n
.do4er
.do8et.
.d6o4ra
.do6re.
.d8o1re
.drau4m
.dr4
.du4a
.1du
.du4en.
.du1e2n
.du4er
.du4ge.
.3dug
.du1ge
.du4se.
.du1s
.d2u1se
.du4st
.dy4re.
.1dy
.dø6la.
.1dø
.dø1la
.d2ø6r3
.dø4ve.
.då5ren
.då7ret
.e6
.eb4b4a
.2e1b2
.e2b1b
.e1cu6
.2ec
.ed4da
.e6d1d
.ed4le.
.e4d1l4
.ed1le
.e1fo7
.e1f
.ef4ta
.e8ft
.eft8a5s4
.eg8de.
.e8g1d
.eg1de
.e1ge2
.ege5l
.eg7enhet2
.eg2en
.ege2n1h2
.eg6ga.
.e4g1g
.eg1ga
.eg4ge.
.eg1ge
.eg4gel
.e6g8la.
.egl2a
.eg4le.
.eg1l6e
.eg6na.
.eg1n
.eg1na
.eg4ne.
.eg1n4e
.e8gs4
.eg8se.
.eg1se
.eg5si
.ei2
.e2i1d5a
.e2i5den
.ei1de
.ei4ga.
.ei3ga
.e2ig
.ei7g2er
.ei1g6e
.ei1k5a
.e2ik
.ei4ke.
.ei1ke
.4ei3l
.4ei3m
.ei8ma.
.e4i1ma
.ei8me.
.ei1me
.ein7as
.e6i1na
.e4i3ni
.ei9rar
.2e2ir
.ei1ra
.ei5res
.ei1re
.ei1r9u
.ei5te
.ei1t9r4
.ekk4o
.2e2kk
.ek4le.
.e1kl4
.ek1le
.ek3li
.ek6ne.
.4e2k1n2
.ek1ne
.2e1k4r6
.ek8sa.
.e4ks
.ek1sa
.ek5se
.ek8se.
.1ek4sp2
.eks3t
.ek8ta
.e6k1t
.ek4te.
.ek1te
.4ek7to
.el8da.
.e2ld
.el1da
.el4de.
.el1de
.el4g5r4
.e2lg
.el4i5ne
.2e1li
.e2l3k2
.e2l5l
.e2l6s
.el6s4k2l4
.els6t
.el6ta.
.e2l1t
.el6te.
.el1te
.el4ve.
.e8lv
.el1ve
.el6veg
.e2m3b2
.em1fa9
.e2m1f
.em4ma.
.e2m1m4
.em1ma
.em8me.
.em1me
.em6na.
.e2m1n
.em1na
.e2m5p
.2e1n5a
.en4da.
.e6nd
.en1da
.en4de.
.en1de
.1end5r4
.en4ga.
.en1g6a
.e2ng
.en6gav
.en3ge
.en4ge.
.en6ka
.e2nk
.en4ke.
.en1ke
.en6sa
.e6ns
.en4se.
.en1se
.en5so
.en3sp2
.e6n5t
.en6te.
.en1te
.ent4r4
.en6t5ra
.en4t8re
.e2p6t
.2e1p
.2e1r8a
.e1r4e
.er4g5r4
.2e2r1g
.8er4ke
.e4r1k
.er4la.
.e2r1l
.er4le.
.er1le
.er6ma.
.e2r1m
.er1ma
.er4me.
.er3me
.er4mek
.er4na.
.2e2rn
.er3na
.er6ta.
.2erta
.e6r1t
.er4te.
.er1te
.es9ast
.e1sa
.e1sas
.es1k
.e1s3ka
.e2s8ka.
.es4ke.
.e2s1ke
.es5l4
.es8la.
.e1sla
.e2s8le.
.es1le
.e1s3p2
.es6pa.
.es1pa
.e6s6r
.es8sa.
.e2s1s
.es4se.
.es1se
.es4so
.es5ta
.es3te
.e6s6te.
.e4s7tet
.es5ti
.est3r4
.e1s7tu
.et8la.
.6e6t3l6
.et7la
.et8le.
.et1le
.et4na
.2e6t1n
.et4ne.
.et1ne
.et8sa.
.e4ts1
.et1s4e
.et6se.
.et1s4i
.et7te4
.e6tt
.ev8ja
.e1v
.e2vj
.ev4je.
.ev1j2e
.ev4ne.
.e2v1n
.ev1ne
.ev5nem
.ex4
.f4
.f2a2e2
.1fa
.fa8g3s4
.fa4ne.
.5fa1ne
.fe4e2
.1fe
.fei4l5i
.f4eil
.fe2l
.f2e1la9
.fe2l5l
.fel4ta
.fe2l1t
.fe4ma
.f8e8me
.fe4r6s
.fe8sl4
.fe8st
.fi6a
.1fi
.fi4le.
.fi1le
.fisk9ås2
.fi2sk
.fi1skå
.f2jel4
.1fj
.fj2e
.fla4t5o
.f2l2
.fo4bi.
.1fo
.f2o3b4i
.fol2
.fo2r
.for7d6rar
.fo4rd
.fordr4
.for5en.
.f8ore
.for6m5s
.fo2r1m
.fri5e6re
.fr2
.fri1er
.fr2ie
.fug2
.1fu
.fu6ge.
.fu1ge
.ful2
.fu8se.
.f2u1se
.fy8s4e
.1fy
.f2ys
.fø8rel
.1fø
.f8ør
.fø1re
.g6
.gaf7
.1ga
.ga4le.
.g2a1le
.ga8li.
.ga1li
.ga4me
.ga4ne.
.9ga1ne
.gan8g5s4
.ga2ng
.gas4
.gas5ta
.g2a2t
.ga4ve.
.g2a1ve
.ga9ve1e2
.2g2e2a
.1ge
.ge1l4e
.ge3ne
.g2en
.ge4nis
.ge1ni
.ge6n5s
.2ge2o
.ge9sv2
.g6es
.gh2a5
.2g1h
.gif4t5s
.1gi
.g2if
.gi2ft
.gi4n
.gi4s
.4gis7p2
.glo6i
.6g1lo9v
.gl2y5s
.glø9se
.2gløs
.g1lø
.gnå7la
.g1n
.g2nå
.g1nål
.go5de1s
.1go
.g2o1d
.go1d4e
.g2os7
.g2re2i4e
.1gr4
.grun6n5s
.gru4nn
.gu4de.
.1gu
.g2ud
.gu1de
.gu4lat
.gu1la
.gus1
.gu4tu.
.gu1tu
.gø2
.gå4v
.1gå
.h4
.h4a6ka.
.h2a
.ha5ka
.ha8ma.
.ha5ma
.hand5s6l4
.h4an8ds
.ha6nd
.handsla9
.ha6vi
.he4er.
.he1e2
.he2i5e
.he2i
.he2n
.he2s4s5
.het7se
.het2
.he4ts1
.hi2l4l
.hi4n
.hi6re.
.h2ir
.hi1re
.h2o2d
.h4o
.h6o2e
.ho4re.
.h8or2e1
.ho5ren
.ho7ret
.ho8ta.
.h2ot
.ho1ta
.ho8va.
.ho1v
.hu4di
.h2ud
.hus6val
.hus1v2
.hy6ra.
.h6y
.hy1ra
.hy4re.
.hø4re
.hø4va
.hø4ve.
.hø1ve
.hå8en.
.h6å
.h4å1e
.håe2n
.hå8er
.hånd5s6l4
.hå6nd
.hån8ds
.i2
.i3a4
.i3bl2
.i1b2
.2i4da
.ifø5re
.2if
.i3fø
.if8ør
.i6g8la.
.2ig
.ig1l
.igl2a
.ig4le.
.ig1l6e
.i4her
.i3h
.2ik2
.i2k6k
.ik1ke5
.i3k6l4
.i6k5t
.ik8te.
.ik1te
.i5k1v2
.i3la
.i4la.
.i8lan1de
.il6a6nd
.ilbo8da
.i2l1b2
.ilb2o
.ilb2o1d
.il6de.
.i2ld
.il1de
.i3leg
.i1le
.i6le1s
.il4ja
.i2lj
.il6je.
.il1j2e
.il6ke.
.il1k4e3
.i2l1k
.il4le.
.i2l1l
.il1le
.il6sk
.i2l1s
.il4te.
.i2l1t
.il1te
.imø5te.
.i3mø2
.i5m4øt
.imø1te
.in5ad
.6i1na
.in5de
.i6nd
.in8ga.
.i2ng
.in1ga
.in4ge.
.in1ge
.in3gr4
.in6gri
.2i2n5k2
.in6ka.
.in1ka
.in4ne.
.i4nn
.in1ne
.in4nel
.in5nen
.2in4n3i4
.i6n5s
.in7t4es
.i6n1t
.in1te
.io4na
.4io
.i2on
.io4nom
.io1no
.i4rer
.2ir
.i1re
.ir8ra.
.i2r1r
.ir6re.
.ir3r6e
.i6sa
.i3sc
.i6se
.is5k
.isl4a8ga
.is1l4
.i2s4le.
.is1le
.is4let
.is4me.
.is1m
.is1me
.i8s8na.
.is1n
.is1na
.i4s8ne.
.is5ne
.i5s1pe
.is1p2
.i2s3s4
.is6sa.
.is4se.
.is1se
.is5sk
.ist6
.i2s8te.
.i2s1te
.i5s2ted
.i5s2tem
.is7ti
.i6s7tj
.i6s7tr4
.is8ut.
.6isu
.i2s1u4t1
.i6s5ø
.i5t2i
.4i3va
.i4van
.i4var.
.i3ve
.i4vel
.i6ven
.i4v8er.
.i4ve1re
.iv8ra.
.i2v3r8
.iv6re.
.iv1re
.i3ø
.j4
.ja4de.
.ja1de
.1j2a6e2
.ja4ne
.ja8se.
.ja7se
.ja4va.
.ja1va
.2j2e2a2
.j2e
.2je2l
.2je2m
.je5r6e
.jer6n5s4
.j2e2rn
.je4ta
.ji4
.jo8en.
.j2o
.j6o1e
.joe2n
.jo4se.
.2j2os
.jo3se
.ju6a
.ju6la
.ju2l
.ju1le3
.jø4d2e1p
.j2ø
.jø1de
.k6
.kaf2
.k8a6la.
.ka6li.
.ka1li
.ka5me
.1kam
.1ka3na
.ka4ne.
.1ka1ne
.ka4p3r2
.ka4ra.
.1ka1ra
.ka6re.
.ka1re
.ka5rin
.k2a1ri
.ka4te.
.ka1te
.kau9k
.ka6va.
.2kav
.ka1va
.ka4ve.
.k2a1ve
.ke6e2
.1ke
.kel3
.kier3
.k2ie2
.k6i4na
.ki7ni
.k2i2no3
.1k2ir2
.ki4se.
.ki3se
.ki8va.
.k6iv
.k4i1va
.ki6ve.
.ki1ve
.kje4k
.kj2
.kj2e
.k4je1k7l4
.kj4ø4nn4
.kj2ø
.kle4s
.kl4
.k1le
.kl4i5ne
.k1li
.klo9va
.2k1lov
.kly7sa
.kl2ys
.kna7se
.2k1n2
.k1na
.ko6da.
.ko5da
.k2o1d
.ko7gr4
.k2og
.k4o4la
.2k2o3le
.ko8le.
.k3o2l5j
.ko3pe
.ko6pe.
.ko4se.
.1k2os
.ko1se
.ko6ta.
.k2ot
.ko1ta
.ko4te.
.ko1te
.ko6ve.
.krin8g5s1
.kr6
.kri2ng
.4ks6
.ku4le
.ku8ra.
.ku7ra
.ku4re.
.ku1re
.ku8ta.
.ku1ta
.4ku8te.
.ku1te
.kva9ra
.kv2
.kva9re
.k4v4e9ka
.kve5ke
.ky8la.
.ky1la
.ky4le.
.ky1le
.ky6te.
.2kyt
.ky1te
.kø3s4
.kå6pa
.l6
.la4da.
.l6a1da
.la4de.
.la1de
.l4a4ga
.la4ge.
.la1ge
.la5g2er
.la4ma.
.la1ma
.la6ta.
.l4a1ta1
.la4te.
.la1te
.la3tr4
.la4va
.2lav
.l2a3ve
.la4ve.
.le8ar
.1le
.2l2ea
.le4da.
.2le1da
.le4de.
.le1de
.le4er
.2le1e2
.le6e6t
.le2f
.4l2ef3l2
.leg4a9ta1
.l2e1ga
.leg2at
.le4ge.
.3le1ge
.le4gel
.le8gi.
.le3gi
.lei5er.
.le2ie
.lei4ve
.le4ke.
.le1ke
.2l2e4k5r6
.2le1mu9
.le4ne.
.le1ne
.le7s6a
.le4se.
.l2e1se
.4le4sek
.le4se5s2
.2le4s5p2
.le2t
.le7ta
.let6tan
.le6tt
.let1ta
.le2u3
.le3va
.le1v
.le4va.
.le4ve.
.le4v4es
.li8a
.1li
.l2i4de.
.li1de
.l2i4e4
.li5e1ne
.li1en
.3l2i2g
.li1ga3
.l2i2k
.li4k3s
.l4i4ma
.l2i2nk6
.li6ra
.l2ir
.li4re.
.li1re
.li4sa
.li4se.
.li1se
.li4ta.
.li1ta
.li4te.
.li1te
.li5t2i
.li4ve.
.li1ve
.li4v5en
.l6o4e
.lo6ge.
.1l2og
.lo5ge
.lo8gi.
.lo1gi
.lo4i
.lo6na
.l2on
.l2o8o
.lo6ri
.lo8sa.
.lo7sa
.l2os
.lo4se.
.lo1se
.lo6te
.l2ot
.lo4va
.1lov
.lo3ve
.lo4ve.
.l1pe4
.2l1p
.l2u4d
.lu2e
.lu4na
.lu6pa
.lu4pe.
.lu1pe
.lu6ra.
.lu1ra
.lu4re.
.lu1r2e
.lu6se.
.l2u1se
.lu4ta.
.luta3
.lu9ta1s4
.ly4de.
.ly1de
.ly8d3s
.l4y8e
.ly8ge
.ly4se.
.l2ys
.ly1s4e
.ly4sk4
.ly8st3r4
.lys2t
.ly4te.
.ly1te
.ly4ve.
.ly3ve
.ly1v
.lø8de.
.1lø
.lø1de
.lø6en.
.l4ø1e2
.lø8ne.
.lø1ne
.lø6pa.
.lø1pa
.lø4pe.
.lø1pe
.løye5ne
.4lø4y1e
.løye4n
.lå8ma
.l6åm
.lå5re
.2lår
.lå6re.
.lå4te.
.lå1te
.m8
.ma4ge.
.1ma
.ma1ge
.ma2g9r4
.ma3ka
.ma4ke.
.m2a1ke
.mak4t5s
.ma6k1t
.ma4le.
.m2a1le
.ma4li.
.ma1li
.m6a4na.
.ma1na
.ma4ne.
.ma3ne
.ma4ni.
.ma1ni
.ma4ra.
.ma1ra
.7ma4re.
.ma1re
.ma4ri.
.3m2a1r4i
.ma4sa.
.m4a1sa
.ma4si
.ma6st
.ma8ta.
.m6at
.m4a1ta1
.2ma4v
.me4de
.1me
.2me4d3r4
.mei5er.
.me2i2e
.mei5et
.me2k5l4
.me6la.
.m2el
.4m2e1la
.4m2e4l5ø
.me6na.
.m2e1na
.me4ne.
.me1ne
.m4e3ri
.2me4sk
.mes5ti
.me4tri
.m2e1tr4
.4mi6kj2
.1mi
.m2ik
.mi4le.
.mi1le
.mi4me.
.2mim
.mi1me
.mi4ni.
.mi1ni
.mi4n2ik
.mi6ni3se
.min1s5ki
.mi6n2s
.m4insk
.mi6st
.m1ne6
.2m1n
.5mo5d4e
.1mo
.m2o1d
.mo6er
.3m6o1e
.mo4na.
.m2on
.mo1na
.mo8ne.
.mo3ne
.mon4st
.mo6n1s
.monst5r4
.mo4re.
.m8o3re
.mo4se.
.m2os
.mo1se
.mo4ta
.m2ot
.mo4tek
.mo1te
.mo4ter
.4mo4tr4
.mo5v
.mu8ga
.1mu
.2mug
.mu8ge.
.mu1ge
.mu6le.
.mu1le
.mu2l5e6s
.my8ka
.1my
.m6yk
.my4ke.
.my3ke
.mø4re.
.1mø
.mø1re
.mø5re1s2
.5m4ø2t
.må6la.
.1må
.m6ål
.må1la
.mål3o
.n8
.2nab2o3
.1na
.na6ge.
.na3ge
.2nak2
.na8ke.
.n2a1ke
.na6n5s
.na4r
.na4sa.
.n4a1sa
.nat2
.na3tr4
.nat6tr4
.na6tt
.ne4de.
.1ne
.ne1de
.ne4den
.ne4d5i
.ne4d3r4
.5ne8d3s4
.ne2i5e
.2nei
.ne8pa.
.2n2e1p
.ne1pa
.ne6pe.
.ne5pe
.ne2s
.ne4t
.ni8ar
.1ni
.ni6er
.n2ie
.nig4l
.n2ig
.4ni5ko3
.n2ik
.ni4na.
.n6i1na
.ni4pa.
.ni1pa
.ni6pe.
.ni1pe
.ni8sa
.ni6se.
.ni1se
.ni1ta9
.n4it
.ni4to
.4n4i4va
.no6de.
.1no
.n2o1d
.no1d4e
.3n6o6e
.no8ka
.2nok
.no4me.
.n2o1me
.no8mi.
.no1mi
.no4r
.no8se
.n2os
.no8si.
.no1si
.no4va.
.no1v
.6ns6
.6n1t4
.nu4e
.1nu
.ny5a
.1ny
.ny8sa.
.n2y1s
.ny1sa
.ny6se.
.ny5s4e
.ny4te.
.ny3te
.næ8r9a6st.
.1næ1
.næ4re.
.næ1re
.4nø6d4d
.1nø
.nø4re.
.nø1re
.nå6da.
.1n6å1d
.nå1da
.nå4de.
.nå1de
.nå6le.
.1nål
.nå1le
.o6
.ob6o5e
.o1b4o
.od4da.
.2o1d
.o6d1d
.od1da
.od4de.
.od1de
.od8la.
.o4d1l4
.od3la
.od8le.
.od1le
.off1si6
.o2ff
.of2f1s
.of4te.
.6o2ft
.of1te
.of5t2e1b2
.2og4
.o2k1k
.ok8ka.
.ok1ka
.4ok8ke
.ok4se.
.ok1s4e
.o4ks
.ol8d3s
.2o2ld
.ol4ga.
.o2lg
.ol1ga
.2o1li5
.ol8la
.o2l1l
.ol8le.
.ol1le
.o2l6m
.om1
.om4ar.
.2o1ma
.om6bo.
.o2m1b6
.omb2o
.om4e6n
.2o1me
.om4gå.
.o2m1g
.om1gå
.om4me
.2o2m1m4
